Maryland, session 2025, SB0447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–342.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EMERGENCY PREGNANCY–RELATED MEDICAL CONDITION”
MEANS:
(I) A A MEDICAL CONDITION THAT PRESENTS IN A PREGNANT
PATIENT THROUGH ACUTE SYMPTOMS OF SUFFICIENT SEVERITY, INCLUDING
SEVERE PAIN, AND FOR WHICH THE ABSENCE OF IMMEDIATE MEDICAL ATTENTION
COULD BE REASONABLY EXPECTED TO RESULT IN:
1. (I) PLACING THE HEALTH OF THE INDIVIDUAL OR,
WITH RESPECT TO A PREGNANT WOMAN, THE HEALTH OF THE WOMAN OR HER
UNBORN CHILD, PATIENT IN SERIOUS JEOPARDY;
2. (II) SERIOUS IMPAIRMENT TO BODILY FUNCTIONS; OR
3. (III) SERIOUS DYSFUNCTION OF ANY BODILY ORGAN OR
BODY PART; OR
(II) WITH RESPECT TO A PREGNANT WOMAN WHO IS HAVING
CONTRACTIONS:
1. THERE BEING INADEQUATE TIME TO EFFECT A SAFE
TRANSFER TO ANOTHER HOSPITAL BEFORE DELIVERY; OR
2. TRANSFER POSING A THREAT TO THE HEALTH OR
SAFETY OF THE WOMAN OR UNBORN CHILD.
(3) “STABILIZE” MEANS:
(I) FOR, FOR AN EMERGENCY PREGNANCY–RELATED MEDICAL
CONDITION AS DEFINED IN PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, TO PROVIDE
THE MEDICAL TREATMENT NECESSARY TO ALLEVIATE THE CONDITION OR ENSURE,
WITHIN REASONABLE MEDICAL PROBABILITY, THAT NO MATERIAL DETERIORATION
OF THE CONDITION IS LIKELY TO RESULT FROM OR OCCUR DURING THE TRANSFER
OF THE INDIVIDUAL PATIENT FROM THE FACILITY; OR

SENATE BILL 447 3
(II) FOR AN EMERGENCY MEDICAL CONDITION AS DEFINED IN
PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE WOMAN HAS DELIVERED THE
NEWBORN, INCLUDING DELIVERY OF THE PLACENTA.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A HOSPITAL WITH AN EMERGENCY
DEPARTMENT.
(C) ON THE REQUEST OF AN INDIVIDUAL PRESENTING AT A HOSPITAL
EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT OR THE INDIVIDUAL’S REPRESENTATIVE, A HOSPITAL
SHALL PROVIDE AN APPROPRIATE MEDICAL SCREENING TO DETERMINE WHETHER
THE INDIVIDUAL HAS AN EMERGENCY MEDICAL CONDITION.
(D) IF A HOSPITAL DETERMINES THAT AN INDIVIDUAL A PATIENT HAS AN
EMERGENCY PREGNANCY–RELATED MEDICAL CONDITION, THE HOSPITAL SHALL:
(1) USING THE STAFF AND FACILITIES AVAILABLE AT TO THE
HOSPITAL, PROVIDE FURTHER EXAMINATION AND THE TREATMENT REQUIRED TO
STABILIZE THE EMERGENCY PREGNANCY–RELATED MEDICAL CONDITION,
INCLUDING THE TERMINATION OF A PREGNANCY WHEN THE TERMINATION IS
MEDICALLY NECESSARY TO STABILIZE THE PATIENT; OR
(2) TRANSFER THE INDIVIDUAL PATIENT TO ANOTHER MEDICAL
FACILITY.
(D) A HOSPITAL SHALL ALLOW THE TERMINATION OF A PREGNANCY AT THE
HOSPITAL IF THE PATIENT’S TREATING HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER DETERMINES
TERMINATION IS MEDICALLY NECESSARY TO STABILIZE A PATIENT.
(E) (1) A HOSPITAL IS CONSIDERED TO HAVE MET THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SECTION IF, AFTER OFFERING FURTHER EXAMINATION AND TREATMENT OR
TRANSFER TO THE INDIVIDUAL PATIENT OR THE INDIVIDUAL’S PATIENT’S
REPRESENTATIVE AND INFORMING THE INDIVIDUAL PATIENT OR INDIVIDUAL’S
PATIENT’S REPRESENTATIVE OF THE RISKS AND BENEFITS OF FURTHER
EXAMINATION AND TREATMENT OR TRANSFER:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL A PATIENT OR THE INDIVIDUAL’S
PATIENT’S REPRESENTATIVE REFUSES TO CONSENT TO FURTHER EXAMINATION
AND TREATMENT; OR
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL A PATIENT OR THE INDIVIDUAL’S
PATIENT’S REPRESENTATIVE REFUSES TO CONSENT TO A TRANSFER TO ANOTHER
MEDICAL FACILITY.

SENATE BILL 447
(2) A HOSPITAL SHALL TAKE REASONABLE STEPS TO SECURE
WRITTEN INFORMED CONSENT TO THE REFUSAL OF AN EXAMINATION OR
TREATMENT OR TRANSFER UNDER THIS SUBSECTION FROM THE INDIVIDUAL
PATIENT OR THE INDIVIDUAL’S PATIENT’S REPRESENTATIVE.
(F) IF AN INDIVIDUAL A PATIENT HAS AN EMERGENCY
PREGNANCY–RELATED MEDICAL CONDITION THAT HAS NOT BEEN STABILIZED, THE
HOSPITAL MAY NOT TRANSFER THE INDIVIDUAL PATIENT UNLESS: THE TRANSFER
IS DONE CONSISTENT WITH 42 U.S.C. § 1395DD.
(1) THE TRANSFERRING HOSPITAL PROVIDES THE MEDICAL
TREATMENT AVAILABLE AT THE HOSPITAL THAT MINIMIZES THE RISKS TO THE
INDIVIDUAL’S HEALTH AND, IN THE CASE OF A WOMAN IN LABOR, THE HEALTH OF
THE UNBORN CHILD;
(2) THE RECEIVING FACILITY HAS AVAILABLE SPACE AND QUALIFIED
PERSONNEL TO TREAT THE INDIVIDUAL AND HAS AGREED TO ACCEPT THE
TRANSFER OF THE INDIVIDUAL AND TO PROVIDE APPROPRIATE MEDICAL
TREATMENT;
(3) THE TRANSFERRING HOSPITAL PROVIDES TO THE RECEIVING
FACILITY ALL MEDICAL RECORDS OR COPIES OF MEDICAL RECORDS RELATING TO:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL’S EMERGENCY MEDICAL CONDITION;
(II) OBSERVATION OF SIGNS AND SYMPTOMS;
(III) PRELIMINARY DIAGNOSIS;
(IV) TREATMENT PROVIDED;
(V) TEST RESULTS;
(VI) THE INFORMED WRITTEN CONSENT AND CERTIFICATION
REQUIRED UNDER ITEM (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(VII) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF ANY ON–CALL PHYSICIAN WHO
HAS REFUSED OR FAILED TO APPEAR WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME TO PROVIDE
NECESSARY STABILIZING TREATMENT;
(4) THE TRANSFER IS EFFECTED THROUGH QUALIFIED PERSONNEL
AND TRANSPORTATION EQUIPMENT, INCLUDING THE USE OF NECESSARY AND
MEDICALLY APPROPRIATE LIFE SUPPORT MEASURES DURING THE TRANSFER; AND

SENATE BILL 447 5
(5) (I) THE INDIVIDUAL OR THE INDIVIDUAL’S REPRESENTATIVE,
AFTER BEING INFORMED OF THE HOSPITAL’S RESPONSIBILITIES UNDER THIS
SECTION AND THE RISKS OF TRANSFER, REQUESTS IN WRITING THE TRANSFER TO
ANOTHER FACILITY; AND
(II) 1. A PHYSICIAN HAS SIGNED A CERTIFICATION THAT:
A. STATES THAT, BASED ON THE INFORMATION
AVAILABLE AT THE TIME OF TRANSFER, THE MEDICAL BENEFITS REASONABLY
EXPECTED FROM THE PROVISION OF APPROPRIATE MEDICAL TREATMENT AT
ANOTHER MEDICAL FACILITY OUTWEIGH THE RISKS TO THE INDIVIDUAL AND, IN
THE CASE OF LABOR, TO THE UNBORN CHILD FROM EFFECTING THE TRANSFER; AND
B. CONTAINS A SUMMARY OF THE RISKS AND BENEFITS
OF TRANSFER; OR
2. IF A PHYSICIAN IS NOT PHYSICALLY PRESENT IN THE
EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT AT THE TIME THE INDIVIDUAL IS TRANSFERRED, A
QUALIFIED MEDICAL PROVIDER HAS SIGNED A CERTIFICATION THAT:
A. STATES THAT, BASED ON THE INFORMATION
AVAILABLE AT THE TIME OF TRANSFER, THE MEDICAL BENEFITS REASONABLY
EXPECTED FROM THE PROVISION OF APPROPRIATE MEDICAL TREATMENT AT
ANOTHER MEDICAL FACILITY OUTWEIGH THE RISKS TO THE INDIVIDUAL AND, IN
THE CASE OF LABOR, TO THE UNBORN CHILD FROM EFFECTING THE TRANSFER;
B. CONTAINS A SUMMARY OF THE RISKS AND BENEFITS
OF TRANSFER; AND
C. IS SUBSEQUENTLY COUNTERSIGNED BY A PHYSICIAN
WHO, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE QUALIFIED MEDICAL PROVIDER, HAS MADE THE
DETERMINATION THAT BASED ON THE INFORMATION AVAILABLE AT THE TIME OF
TRANSFER, THE MEDICAL BENEFITS REASONABLY EXPECTED FROM THE PROVISION
OF APPROPRIATE MEDICAL TREATMENT AT ANOTHER MEDICAL FACILITY
OUTWEIGHED THE RISKS TO THE INDIVIDUAL AND, IN THE CASE OF LABOR, TO THE
UNBORN CHILD FROM EFFECTING THE TRANSFER.
(G) IF A PHYSICIAN DETERMINES AFTER THE MEDICAL SCREENING THAT AN
INDIVIDUAL REQUIRES THE SERVICES OF A PHYSICIAN ON THE HOSPITAL’S LIST OF
ON–CALL PHYSICIANS AND THE ON–CALL PHYSICIAN REFUSES OR FAILS TO APPEAR
WITHIN A REASONABLE PERIOD OF TIME AFTER NOTIFICATION FROM THE
PHYSICIAN, THE PHYSICIAN WHO PROVIDED NOTIFICATION TO THE ON–CALL
PHYSICIAN IS NOT LIABLE FOR A PENALTY UNDER THIS SECTION FOR A TRANSFER
THAT OTHERWISE MET THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 447
(H) A HOSPITAL THAT HAS SPECIALIZED CAPABILITIES OR FACILITIES OR A
REGIONAL REFERRAL CENTER MAY NOT REFUSE AN APPROPRIATE TRANSFER OF AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO REQUIRES THE HOSPITAL’S SPECIALIZED CAPABILITIES OR
FACILITIES IF THE HOSPITAL HAS THE CAPACITY TO TREAT THE INDIVIDUAL.
(I) A HOSPITAL MAY NOT DELAY PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATE MEDICAL
SCREENING EXAMINATION OR FURTHER MEDICAL EXAMINATION TO INQUIRE ABOUT
THE INDIVIDUAL’S METHOD OF PAYMENT OR INSURANCE STATUS.
(J) (G) A HOSPITAL MAY NOT PENALIZE OR TAKE OTHER ADVERSE
ACTION, INCLUDING AN ACTION RELATED TO DISCHARGE, PROMOTION, DEMOTION,
SUSPENSION, COMPENSATION, TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES, STAFF PRIVILEGES, OR
ADMITTING PRIVILEGES, AGAINST:
(1) A QUALIFIED MEDICAL TREATING HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IF
THE PROVIDER REFUSES TO AUTHORIZE THE TRANSFER OF AN INDIVIDUAL A
PATIENT WITH AN EMERGENCY PREGNANCY–RELATED MEDICAL CONDITION THAT
HAS NOT BEEN STABILIZED;
(2) A QUALIFIED MEDICAL TREATING HEALTH CARE PROVIDER IF
THE PROVIDER’S TREATMENT OF THE PATIENT IS CONSISTENT WITH THE MEDICAL
STANDARDS OF CARE THAT, IN THE PROVIDER’S CLINICAL JUDGMENT, WERE
NECESSARY TO STABILIZE THE PATIENT; OR
(3) A HOSPITAL EMPLOYEE IF THE EMPLOYEE REPORTS A VIOLATION
OF THIS SECTION.
(K) (H) A HOSPITAL THAT NEGLIGENTLY VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS
SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF:
(1) FOR A HOSPITAL WITH 100 OR MORE BEDS, NOT MORE THAN
$50,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION; OR
(2) FOR A HOSPITAL WITH FEWER THAN 100 BEDS, NOT MORE THAN
$25,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
(I) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL STAY A FINAL DECISION ON A
POTENTIAL VIOLATION IF THERE IS AN ONGOING FEDERAL INVESTIGATION UNDER
42 U.S.C. § 1395DD REGARDING THE SAME INCIDENT.
(2) IF A FEDERAL INVESTIGATION UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 1395DD
RESULTS IN A FINE BEING IMPOSED FOR THE SAME INCIDENT, THE DEPARTMENT

SENATE BILL 447 7
SHALL SUBTRACT THE AMOUNT OF THE FEDERAL FINE FROM THE MAXIMUM
POTENTIAL FINE UNDER THIS SECTION FOR THE SAME INCIDENT.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, IF A
FEDERAL INVESTIGATION UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 1395DD RESULTS IN A FINE BEING
IMPOSED FOR THE SAME INCIDENT WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER THE DEPARTMENT
IMPOSES A FINE UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REFUND THE
HOSPITAL AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE AMOUNT OF THE FEDERAL FINE.
(II) THE AMOUNT REFUNDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF THE FINE IMPOSED BY THE
DEPARTMENT FOR THE SAME INCIDENT.
(L) (1) A PHYSICIAN, INCLUDING AN ON–CALL PHYSICIAN, WHO IS
RESPONSIBLE FOR THE EXAMINATION, TREATMENT, OR TRANSFER OF AN
INDIVIDUAL UNDER THIS SECTION AND WHO NEGLIGENTLY VIOLATES THIS SECTION
IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF NOT MORE THAN $50,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION.
(2) IF A PHYSICIAN, INCLUDING AN ON–CALL PHYSICIAN, WHO IS
RESPONSIBLE FOR THE EXAMINATION, TREATMENT, OR TRANSFER OF AN
INDIVIDUAL UNDER THIS SECTION IS FOUND TO BE GROSSLY NEGLIGENT IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION OR IS FOUND TO HAVE REPEATEDLY VIOLATED THIS
SECTION, THE PHYSICIAN IS SUBJECT TO EXCLUSION FROM PARTICIPATION IN THE
MARYLAND MEDICAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(M) (1) IN A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST A HOSPITAL FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL WHO INCURS PERSONAL HARM AS A DIRECT RESULT OF
THE VIOLATION MAY OBTAIN DAMAGES AVAILABLE FOR PERSONAL INJURY AND
APPROPRIATE EQUITABLE RELIEF.
(2) IN A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST A HOSPITAL FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION, A MEDICAL FACILITY THAT INCURS A FINANCIAL LOSS AS THE RESULT OF
THE VIOLATION MAY OBTAIN DAMAGES FOR FINANCIAL LOSS AND APPROPRIATE
EQUITABLE RELIEF.
(3) A CIVIL ACTION AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
FILED WITHIN 2 YEARS AFTER THE DATE THE CAUSE OF ACTION OCCURS.
20–214.
(b) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 19–342.1 OF THIS ARTICLE, A
licensed hospital, hospital director, or hospital governing board may not be required:

SENATE BILL 447
(i) To [permit] AUTHORIZE ALLOW, within the hospital, the
performance of any medical procedure that results in artificial insemination, sterilization,
or termination of pregnancy; or
(ii) To refer to any source for these medical procedures.
(2) The refusal to [permit] AUTHORIZE ALLOW or to refer to a source for
these procedures may not be grounds for:
(i) Civil liability to another person; or
(ii) Disciplinary or other recriminatory action against the person by
this State or any person.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.